test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-vuassa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - vuassa: # N_EVEN (without orthographic CG, but with Umlaut)
    vuassa+N+Sg+Nom: vuassa
    vuassa+N+Sg+Gen: vuossa
    vuassa+N+Sg+Acc: vuossav
    vuassa+N+Sg+Ill: vuassaj
    vuassa+N+Sg+Ine: vuossan
    vuassa+N+Sg+Ela: [vuossast, vuossas]
    vuassa+N+Sg+Com: [vuossajn, vuossajna]
    vuassa+N+Pl+Nom: vuossa
    vuassa+N+Pl+Gen: vuossaj
    vuassa+N+Pl+Acc: vuossajt
    vuassa+N+Pl+Ill: vuossajda
    vuassa+N+Pl+Ine: vuossajn
    vuassa+N+Pl+Ela: [vuossajst, vuossajs]
    vuassa+N+Pl+Com: [vuossaj, vuossajgum]
    vuassa+N+Ess: vuassan
#    vuassa+N+Abe: vuossadak

 
 
